Washington statutes.
RCW 11.97.900

Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to the provisions of chapters 11.95A, 11.98, 11.100, and 11.104B RCW and to RCW 11.106.020.

[ 2021 c 140 s 3612; 2003 c 254 s 5; 1985 c 30 s 39. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 65.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 3101-3614: See RCW 11.95A.903.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.